Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB390.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1517.2. Supplemental Public Transportation Operating Assistance Allocation for Growing Counties Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Supplemental Public Transportation Operating Assistance Allocation for Growing Counties Grant Program is established in the department.(b) Powers and duties of department.--The department:(1) Shall administer the program.(2) Shall establish an annual operating assistance grant application process for applicants.(3) To the extent that money is appropriated or 12345678910111213141516171819 otherwise made available to the department for the program, shall provide operating assistance to eligible entities.(4) M ay develop guidelines specifying additional requirements for grants available under the program.(c) Eligible entities.--(1) The following entities are eligible to apply for a grant under the program:(i) An entity that is a recipient of grants awarded by the department under section 1513 (relating to operating program) or 1516 (relating to programs of Statewide significance) and meets the criteria for a county growing in population under subsection (e).(ii) An entity that is a recipient of grants awarded by the department under section 1513 or 1516 and meets the criteria for a county growing in employment under subsection (d).(2) An eligible entity that meets the requirements under subsection (d) or (e), or both, may submit one application annually for grants under the program.(d) Grants to county growing in employment.--(1) Total employment growth for each county for the application grant year shall be calculated by the department using the most recent complete annual data for local area unemployment statistics from the Department of Labor and Industry for the previous year and the same figure from five years prior, calculated on a percentage basis.(2) The amount of grant money awarded to an eligible entity shall be determined on the basis of the overall percentage growth for that county over the subject calculation period and awarded to each eligible entity as a 20250SB0390PN0336 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proportional share of the overall amount available for distribution to counties growing in employment.(e) Grants to county growing in population.--(1) Total population for each county for the application grant year and for the five years prior shall be determined by the department using the most recent complete annual data from the American Community Survey conducted by the United States Census Bureau.(2) The amount of money awarded to an eligible entity shall be determined on the basis of the overall percentage growth for that county over the subject calculation period and awarded to each eligible entity as a proportional share of the overall amount available for distribution to counties growing in population.(f) Allocation of appropriations.-- Money appropriated to the department for grants awarded under the program shall be allocated annually, based upon eligible applications as follows:(1) Fifty percent to eligible entities within counties growing in employment.(2) Fifty percent to eligible entities within counties growing in population.(g) Use of grant money.--Grants awarded under the program are subject to the same purposes, limitations, conditions and requirements specified in section 1513 or 1516.(h) Local match requirement limitation.--The department may not require a local match requirement greater than the match requirement under section 1513(d).(i) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250SB0390PN0336 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "American community survey." An ongoing annual survey by the United States Census Bureau that publishes and collects data on the population of the United States in accordance with 13 U.S.C. §§ 141 (relating to population and other census information) and 193 (relating to preliminary and supplemental statistics)."County growing in employment." A county with a total number of employed individuals in the preceding calendar year which is higher than the total number of employed individuals in that county over the preceding five years."County growing in population." A county with a total population in the grant application year which is higher than the total population of that over the preceding five years."Local area unemployment statistics." Information published by a program that is a Federal-State cooperative effort between the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor and the Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth in which monthly estimates of total employment and unemployment are prepared and published on a periodic basis."Program." The Supplemental Public Transportation Operating Assistance Allocation for Growing Counties Grant Program established under subsection (a).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0390PN0336 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122